Arkansas, session 2025, SB468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 116, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-116-108. Election for fluoridation of water — Definition.
(a) Residents of counties supplied by a public water system shall have
the option to hold an election of the qualified electors of each county
supplied by the public water system to determine whether or not the public
water system shall fluoridate the water.
(b)(1) An election under this section may be called by:
(A) A petition for each county supplied by the public
water system signed by no less than five percent (5%) of the total number of
votes cast within the county for the office of circuit clerk in the last
election; or
(B) A majority vote of the quorum court of each county
supplied by the public water system.
*SSS257*
04-07-2025 15:51:26 SSS257

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB468
(2)(A) Except as provided under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this
section, an election under this section shall be held at the next general
election.
(B) A subsequent election in the public water system under
this section shall not be held earlier than four (4) years after an election
is held under this section.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the election under this
section shall be held and conducted in accordance with the general election
laws of this state.
(4) The question of whether to fluoridate the water in the
public water system shall be placed upon the ballots of the qualified
electors in the following form:
"___ FOR THE FLUORIDATION OF WATER IN [NAME OF COUNTY]
___ AGAINST THE FLUORIDATION OF WATER IN [NAME OF
COUNTY].".
(c)(1) The petition under this section shall be filed with the county
clerk of the county where the sponsor of the petition resides no less than
one hundred twenty (120) days before the general election.
(2) No more than ten (10) days after the filing of the petition
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the county clerk shall:
(A) Verify the petition;
(B) Certify the petition; and
(C) Notify the county boards of election commissioners for
the counties within the public water system and the board of directors of the
public water system of the verification and certification of the petition.
(3) The petition shall clearly state:
(A) Which county is served by the public water system; and
(B) That the petition is to elect "for" or "against"
fluoridation of the water in the public water system.
(d) If the petition is sufficient, the question of whether to
fluoridate the water in the county shall be placed on the ballot of the
county indicated on the petition.
(e) If the majority of the qualified electors in each of the counties
supplied by the public water system elect to prohibit fluoridation of water,
the public water system shall cease fluoridation of the water within thirty
(30) days of the certification of the election results.
04-07-2025 15:51:26 SSS257

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB468
(f) As used in this section, "public water system" means a facility,
including without limitation a parent system, consecutive system, or other
system, that holds, treats, and supplies water directly or through a
consecutive system or consecutive systems to five thousand (5,000) persons or
more.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-7-136(b), concerning a statewide
fluoridation program, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section,
the company, corporation, municipality, county, government agency, or other
entity that owns or controls a water system shall control the quantity of
fluoride in the water so as to maintain a fluoride content established by the
Department of Health.
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this
section, the board of a public water system may elect to prohibit
fluoridation of the water it supplies.
(B) The results of an election under § 14-16-108 shall
supersede any decision of the board of a public water system regarding the
fluoridation of the water it supplies.

/s/C. Penzo















04-07-2025 15:51:26 SSS257